District of Columbia statutes.
42-402

Defective grants recorded before April 27, 1994.

(a)

Any instrument recorded in the Office of the Recorder of Deeds before April 27, 1994, shall be effective notwithstanding the existence of 1 or more of the failures in the formal requisites listed in § 42-404, unless the failure was challenged in a judicial proceeding commenced within 6 months from April 27, 1994.

(b)

Nothing in this section shall affect the validity of instruments recorded before April 27, 1994, which have been validated by prior law.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, ch. 854, § 499a
as added Apr. 27, 1994, D.C. Law 10-110, § 2(e), 41 DCR 1023

Section References

This section is referenced in § 42-404.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-801.1.